hytex/hyph_sme.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.ab1
.ad1
.ak1
.an1
.a2n1g1
.a1n2i1
.a1p1
.a2p2r
.a1ra1
.a2r1t
.a1s2e1
.a2t2r
.au2
.ád2e1
.ál2e1
.bad1
.1b2a
.bá1b
.1bá
.be1t
.1be
.bod1
.1b2o2
.co1o1
.1c2o
.ča1b
.1ča
.čad1
.ča1n
.da2d1
.1da
.d2a2h2
.2dan1
.d2a2s
.dá1ž
.1d2á
.1d2e2k1
.d2e
.de2s1
.1dub1
.d2u
.1d2ud1
.e2be2
.e2k1s1
.2e2k
.el1
.e2mo1
.e1m
.e1r2e1
.e1r
.e1vo1
.2ev
.fad1
.1f2a2
.fa1l1
.fád1
.1f2á
.fi2e
.1f2i
.gad1
.1ga
.ga1ž
.ge2d1
.1ge
.gi2d1
.1gi
.g2ud1
.1gu
.ha1l1
.hat1
.ii1l
.2ii
.i1no1
.2i2n
.i2n1s
.i2n1t1
.i1po1
.i2r2e1
.i1so1
.jab1
.jád1
.1já
.já2s1
.job1
.j2o
.ka1o1
.1k2a
.ka2r1
.ka2s1
.ke1l
.1k2e
.kl2á1
.1k2l2
.1ko1d
.k2o
.la2d1
.1l2a
.la2n1
.1lá2l1
.l2á
.li2d1
.l2i
.lod1
.1lo
.lo1l1
.mad1
.1ma2
.ma1g1
.mak1
.má2k1
.1má2
.ne1b
.1net1
.no1l1
.1no
.no2s1
.n2u1d
.1nu
.o1b2a1
.o1l2a1
.o1l
.o1na1
.o1p2a1
.o2s2e1
.pa1k
.1p2a
.pa2s1
.pá2s1
.1p2á
.p2i1o1
.1p2i
.pi1r
.p2o1l1
.1po
.1ra2d1
.rád1
.r2á
.re1b
.1r2e
.re2m1
.re2s1
.reu1
.rid1
.1ri
.ri2l1
.1rod1
.r2o
.r2ud1
.1ru
.r2ul1
.sed1
.1s2e
.si1f1
.1s2i
.s2i1o1
.so2d1
.1so
.so2p1
.s2o1s
.2st2
.1s2ud1
.s2u2p1
.sy1k1
.1sy
.ša2d1
.1ša
.t2as1
.1ta
.ta1t
.t2e2k1
.1t2e
.2t1v1
.u2i1d
.2ui
.u1r2i1
.uvl1
.va2d1
.1va
.vád1
.1vá
.1vi2d1
a1a
a1á
aái1
ab1bá2
a2b1b
a2bu
2ac
ac1c2i1
a2c1c
aceš1
a1c2e
ač1če1
a2č1č
a2da
adá1ž
a1d2á
a2de.
ad2e
a1de1m
a1de2s
a2det
a2d2ii
a1di
a2d2i2n
a1d2o2
a1d2u
adu1m
a2duv
1a2d1v
a1đe2
a1e
aeas1
ae2a
ae1d
a2el
a2es
aesk2
a2et
a1f
afá1r
a1f2á
af1f2i1
a2f1f2
af2i1k
a1f2i
a2f1r
a1g
a2ga2n
a1ga
a2gav
agá2s1
a1gá
a2ge1b
a1ge
a2ge2d
a2geš
a2get
1agi.
a1gi
a2g2i2n
agir1
ag2no
a2g1n
a2g1r
a2g2ut
a1gu
a2guv
a1ha.
a1hač
a1had1
a1ha1l1
a2he1m
a1he
a2hi
ah1k2á2
a2hk
a2h1l
ah1to1
a2h1t
ahu1m
ah2u
2a2i
ai1b2
ai2d
a2ii
ai1l2e
a1i2sm
ai1to1
a2it
a1j
ajes1
ajje2
a2j1j
a1k2a1
a2k2e
ake2m
ake2s1
2a1k2o
a1kon1
a2k1r
aku1m
a1ku
ak1va1
ak1v
a1l
al2a2i1
a1l2a
a2la1m
a2la1o
a2lat
al2á2m
al2á
1a1lá2r
alá2s2
al2d2e
a2ld
al2di
a2l2e
1a2l1f
a2l2ii
al2i
ali2m
a2l2i2n1
a2l2iv
al1s2i1
a2ls
a1l2u1m
a2lu
a1m
a2ma.
a1ma2
a2ma1m
am1bu1
a2m1b
ame1d
a1me
ame1l
am2ii1
a1mi
a2mu
amy1
an1c2e2
a2nc
an1da1
a2n1d
an1d2á1
an1di1
a1ne.
anil1
a1n2i
an1j
an2je
anna2
a2n1n
a2no
1ano1g
an1os1
an1s2k
a2ns
an1so1
an2s2t
a1o
a1o2a
aois2
ao1s
a1p
ape1r2
a1pe
a2p1r
ap2r2e
a2p2s2
a1ra
ara1b
ara2h
a1r2á
ará1d
a2r2d
a2r2e
are2s1
arne1
a2r1n2
a1r2o2
ar1pe1
a2rp
asár1
a1sá
as1át1
as1c2i1
asc2
as2e2k
a1s2e
ase1l
ase1s
a2s2i
a2sk
a1sk2o
as1m2o1
a2sm
as2mu
a2so
as2o1s
a2s2t
as1tá2
a1s2t1r
asu2
a1sub1
a1s2ui1
a2ša
aš1áh
a1šá
a1ši2s2
a1šoh
a2š2t
a2š2u2h
a1šu
a2šu2m
a2šu2s
at1ál
a1tá
atá1n
ate1g
a1t2e
at2e2k1
a2t1h
at1n2i2
a2t1n2
a2to
at1ta2
a2t1t
at1tá2
au1b
a2u1d
a2ul
a2u1m
a2u1n
au2s2t1
au2s
au1šu1
a2uš
a1uv
ava1r
a1va
av1je1
a2vt1
ax1
a1y2
a1z
az2a2i1
a1za
az1ze1
a2z1z
a2žat
a2že
a2ži
ažže1
a2ž1ž
áb2a2i1
á1b2a
á2bu
á1de2d
ád2e
á1d2e2h
á2det
á2di
á2d2r2
á1d2u
á2d2u2h
á2d2ut
á2duv
á1đe2
áđ1ve1
á2đv
á1e
á1f
áf2a2i1
á1f2a2
á1f2á2
áf2e2
á2f1r
áfr2á2
á1ga
ág2a2i1
ág2a2s1
á1ha1g
á2ha1m
á2he
á1h2u
ái1b2i1
1ái1b2m2
á2id
ái1d2n2
ái2do2
ái2d2u
ái1p2a1
ái1ra2
ái2sa2
ái1va1
á2iv
á1j
á2je
áj1i
á2ju
á2k
áka1t
á1k2a
ák1k2a2
á2k1k2
á2k1r
1á2k1š
á1l2á
1á2l1b2
ál2da
á2ld
á2le2a
ál2e
á1l2i
áll2e1
á2l1l
ál2o2n
á1lo
ál1p2a1
á2lp
á2l2s
á1l2u2m
á2lu
á1l2u2s
ál1va1
á2l1v
2ám
á2me.
á1me
á2me2a
á2met
á1mi2
ám2it2
ámo1t2
á1mo
ám1p2á1
á2m1p
á2mu
á1na
ánar1
án1d2o2
á2n1d
á1ne
áne1b
áne1j
á1ne2l
á1ne2m
á2n2g
á2nis
á1n2i
án1j
án1s2e2
á2ns
á2nu
á1ŋi1
1áŋ1k2o2
á1o
áp1me1
á2p1m
á1ra
á1r2a2i1
á1ra2l
á1r2á
ár1d2u1
á2rd
ár2e2h
á1r2e
ár1ga2
á2r1g
á2ris
á1ri
ár1r2e1
á2r1r
á2s
ása2l
á1sa
ásár1
á1sá
ás1h
á1s2i2
ási2h
ásis2
ás2k2a2
ás1k2o
ás1o1m
á1so
á2s2t
ás1uv
áš2g2o
á2š1g
ášo2
áš1s2i1
áš1s2
áš1tu1
á2št
á2šu
át1
2át.
á2to
2á2t1t
á1ŧ
áva2š
á1va
ávár1
á1vá
ává2s2
á1vi
áv1ri1
áv1r
áv1va2
á2v1v
á1ze1
á2zo2
ážos1
á1žo2
1b2a
ba2d2e
ba2d2u
ba2h
ba2m
ba2n
ba2r
ba2s
bas1h
ba2š
ba1ž
1bá
bá1d2u1
bá2h
bá2j1i
bá1j
b2á2m
bá2ri
bá2š
2b1b
bbá2n
b1bá
bbá2r
bbes2
b1be
bbl2e2
b2b1l2
b2b1oa
b1b2o2
b2b2r
b1bu2
2b1d2
1be
2beah
be2a
be1b
2be1č
be2gi
2b2e2h
beju1
be1l2i
be2ma2
be1m
b2e2r1t
be1r
b1f2i1
b1g
1b2i
bi2d
bi2me
bi1m
b2io1
bi1oh
bi2s
bi2s2t
bi1va1
b2iv
bi1ža1
b1j
2b1l2
bla1s
b1l2a
b2l2á
b1m2
b2man
b1ma2
bmes2
b1me
bmi2l2
b1mi
b1mo2
b2m1o1a
1b2o2
b2oar1
b1oa
bo2k1
bow1
2b1r
brat2
br2ii1
b1ri
br2i1k
b1s2
b2s1t2
bs1ti1
b1sur1
1bu
bu2b
2b2uč
b2ur
b2u2s
bu2s2t
2b2uš
buvi1
2b2už
b1v
1by
by2s
2b'
1ca
ca2d
ca2gi
ca1g
ca2g2o
ca2h
ca2l
ca2m
ca2n
ca2s2e
ca2š
1cá
cá1ha
cá2j
cá2l
cá2n
cá2s2
cá1z
c1b
2c1c
c1d1a
c1d1o2
1c2e
ce1b
ce1d
ce2di
cei1
ce1l2e
ce2ma2
ce1m
2c1g
2c1h
c2ha
char1
c2h1l
1c2i
ci2d
c2i2n
ci2s
ci2s2t
ci2to
c2it
c2i2v
2c1k
ck2v
ckvi1
c1m
1c2o
2c1oa
co2b2a
co2d
co2di1
co1gá1
co1g
co2l
co2m
co2me1
co1r2e2
co2s
co2s2i1
co2t2t
co1t
c2s2
cs2a2i1
c1sa
c1t
c1ty1
1cu
c2u2l
cu2m
c1v
1cy
cy1k1
1ča
ča2ga
ča1g
ča2gu
ča2h
ča2l2i
ča1l
ča2me
ča1m
ča2mu1
ča1na
ča2n2i
ča2s
ča1va1
1čá
čá2l
čá2lu
č2á2m
čá2n2i
čá2r
2č1č
1če
čea1l1
če2a
če1b
če2ma2
če1m
če1še
če2šu
1či2
či2l1d
či2s2t
1č2o
čoa1n
č1oa
čo2d
čo2l
čo2n
čo2ri
čo2sk
čovl1
1ču
ču2g2o
ču2i1k
č2ui
čuj2o1
ču1j
ču2m
1da
da2d
2da2d1d2
da2gi
da1g
d2a2h
dai2d1
d2a2i
da1is
da2lu1
da1l
d2a1m
da2me
2da1mo
2dan
da2n2i
da2n1o
d2a1p
da2r
d2as
da2s2e
d2at
1d2á
dá2d
dá1d2u1
d2á2m
dá2ra
2d1b
d1č
2d1d2
d1da2
ddá2l
d1d2á
dde1b
dd2e
dde2m
d1di2
d2dir
d2d1oa
d1do2
ddu1m
dd2u
d2e
2de2a
1dea1j
dean1
2de2b1b
1de2be
de2d
de1f2i1
1deha
d2e2h
1deh2u
2dei
1de2ik
1d2e2k
1de2l
1de1ma2
de1m
1de2mu
1de1n
1de1o2
2d2ep
1de1r
der2á1
d2e2ru1
de2s
1desk
1de2št
1de2t1b
2de2t1n2
de2t2r
2de2t1t
1d2ev
1deža
1de2že
1de2ži
2d1g
d1há1
d1h2o
1di
d2i1a1
di2d2
di2mi
di1m
di1o1d
d2io
dio2n
dip1
di2s2i
di2s2t
2diš
2d2iv
di1va1
d1j
dja2
djis2
djo2m
dj2o
djo2n
dju2
d1k
d1l
2d1m
d1mi1
d1n2
d2na
1dna.
1dnad
1d1na1g
1d1na1o
2d1ná2
d1ne2m
d2n2i
d1no2
dno1h
d2nu2g
d1nu
d2n2ul
1do2
2do1e1
d2oi
d2o2k
2d1o2lg
do1l
d2on
d1o2r1g
do2t2t
do1t
2d1p2
d1po1
dpr2o1
dp1r
2d1r2
d1r2a2i1
drat2
d2re2s
d1r2e
d1s2
d1š
2dt2
d2u
1du.
1dub
1duc
1d2ud
1dug
du1ga1
du2g2o
1d2u2h
1d2ui
1du2k
du2mu
1d2un
1duo
2dup
1dur
1du1sa
du2s
1du2s1b2
1du1s2e
1du1s2i
1dus1j
1dusk
1du2sm
1du2s1s
1du2s2t
1du2s1v
1d2uš
1du1va
1du1vu
2d1v
d1vo1
dy2s
dyt2
1đ2a2
đa2mu1
đa1m
đaža1
1đ2á2
đá1sa1
đá2s
2đb
đba2d
đ1b2a
đ1b2m2
2đ1đ
1đe
đe2m
đe2s2t
2đ1g
đ1ga2
đge1j
đ1ge
đ2g2ŋ
1đi2
đi1hi
đi2h
2đj
đ1je
đje1j
đ1ji
đ1j2o
đ1ju
2đm
2đŋ
1đo2
đo1gá1
đo1g
1đu2
2đv
đ1vi
đ1vu2
e2a
ead1
eaju1
ea1j
eak1
ea2l1d
ea1l
ea1na
eane1
e1a2no
ea1šo
e1a1tu
e1á
e2b2a
e2be
e2b1m2
ebos1
e1b2o2
2e1c1
ec1c2e2
e2c1c
e2c1h1
e1č
e2da
eda1š
e2de.
ed2e
ede2g
e2det
edis1
e1di
e2d1j
e1d2o2
edov1
edu1m
ed2u
e1dur1
2eđ
eđ1ge1
e2đ1g
e1e
ee1pe2
e2ep
ee1s
e1f2e1
e2ga
egir1
e1gi
e2g2n
ego2i1
eg2o
e1g2r
2e2h
e1há1
eheš1
e1he
eh1k2á2
e2hk
ehu1m
eh2u
ei1b2m2
e2id
ei1d2n2
e1ie
e2ii
ei1l2e
e2i1m
ei1r
eis2k
e1ja
e2j2i2n
ejj2o1
e2j1j
e1j2o
e1j2u1d1
e1jug
2e2k
ek2a2i1
e1k2a
eka1n
e1k2á1
ekk2o2
e2k1k2
ek1no1
e2k1n
e1k2o
e1ko1d
e1ko2r1
ek1sa1
e2k1s
e2l2a
ela2l
elaš1
e1l2á
e2le.
el2e
e2l2e2k
e2l2ep
e1le2š1
e1le1ž
e1l2io1
el2i
e2lis
e2l1n
elo2l
e1lo
e1m
emát2
e1má2
e2me
e2m2i2n
e1mi
e2mo
em1po2
e2m1p
e2mu
e1n
2ena
e1ne1l
e2nis
e1n2i
e2n1j
2e2n1n
e2no
en1os1
en1s2k
e2ns
en2s2t
en1ta1
e2n1t
en1tá1
en1tu1
e1o2
eo1d2á1
eo1p2
eo2sk2
eo1t2
2ep
ep2i1k
e1p2i
e1p2o
ep1p2á1
e2p1p
e1p2r
ep1r2e1
epr2o1
e1r
e2r1ak
e2ra2n
e2r1ár
er2á
2e2r1b
2e2rc
er2d1r2
e2rd
e2r2ep
e1r2e
erg2o1
e2r1g
e2ris
e1ri
e2r2iv
er1k2á1
e2rk
er1k2o2
er1ku1
erl2á1
e2r1l
2er2o
ero1n
er2o2š1
2e2rp
2e2rt
2e1ru
2e2rv
er1va1
e2sab
e1sa
e2s2e
ese1b
ese1d
e2sf
es2h
es1il1
e1s2i
es2i2n
e2sis
es2k2a1
e1s2k2á
es1k2o
e2so
es1o2k
es1or
e1sp
es1sa1
e2s1s
e1s2tá
e2st
e1s2t1r
e2š1á
e2š2g
eš1l2
eš1o
eš2ta2
e2št
eš2t2e
eš2ti2
etá1š
e1tá
e2t1áv
e2t1h
1et1n2i
e2t1n2
e2to
1e1tu
e1um.
e1u2ma2
e1u1me
e1u2m1m2
e2ut1
2ev
evh1
e2vi1đ
exis1
ex1i1
e1y2
eys2
eyt2
eža2d
e1ža1g
e2že
e2ži
e1ä
é1a2
éa2sk2
éat2
é1l
1f2a2
fa2mu1
fa1m
fa1su2
fa1ši
1f2á
fá2h
fá2j
f2á1m
fá2me
fá2ra
fá2ri
fá1ši
fávl1
f2e
fe1b
fe1d
fe2i2n
fe2no1
fe1n
f2e2r1t
fe1r
2f1f2
ffá2l
f1f2á
ffe1i
ff2e
ffi1s
f1f2i
f1f2o2
ff2u1l
f1f2u
1f2i
fia2n
fi1a1
fi2d
fi1e
fi2l2e
fi2me
fi1m
f2i2n
fin1j1
f2i1o1
fi2r
fi2sk
fi2s1p
fi2s2t
f1l
1f2l2a
f2lo
1f2o
fo2d
f2o1ku1
fo2k
fo2s
fo1to1
fo1t
f1r
f1ra1s
f2r2e
f2ru
2f1t
f1ta1
1f2u
fu2m
fy1m
1ga
ga2b2a
1g2ac
ga2d2u
1ga2ga
ga1g
ga2g2o
1ga2h
1ga1l
ga2l2i
ga2m
2ga1mo
ga2mu1
ga2n
ga1n2i1
ga2r
g2a2s
gas1h
1ga2s1v
1ga2šá
gaše1
1ga1šu
1ga1ti
ga2t2t
2ga2ž1ž
1gá
gád2
gá2h
gá2i1d
gá2l
g2á2m
gá2n
gá2v1s
2g1b
2g1d
g1da2
1ge
2gea1m
ge2a
2geas
2geat
gea1ž
ge1b
ge2d
2gei
ge2l
ge2ma2
ge1m
ge2n1o
ge1n
ge2n1s
2g2ep
ge2ra
ge1r
ger2á1
ge1ta1
ge1u
2g1g2
g1ga2l
g1ga
gga2š
g1gá2
gg2u2l
g1gu
ggu2m
2g1h
1gi
gi2b2a
gi2d
gie1
gi2l
gi2m
gina1
g2i2n
gi1n1j
gi2ra
gi2s
gi2s2t
2giš
gi1ti1
g2it
gi2vi
g2iv
g1j
2g1k
2g1l2
gl2á1
g2lá2s
gl2e1
g2lo1
g2ly
2g1m
2g1n
gna1
2g1ŋ
g2o
1go.
1goab
g1oa
1goa1l
1g2oar
1goas
1goa1z
1go2b
1go2d
1goha
go1i
1go2j
1go2k
1go2l
1go2m
1gon
1gor
1gos
1g2o2š
1go1t
1gov
1g2ož
1gra1m
1gr2á
grá1d
g2r2ám
g2r2e
gri2l1
g1ri
2g1r2o
gro1i
2g1s
gs2k
g2su
2gš2
2g1t
1gu
gu2g
gu1l2á1
g2ul
2g1v
2g'
1ha2b1l2
had1
1ha2h
hahr1
2ha2h1t
h2a2i1
1hal.
ha1l
1ha2me1
ha1m
ha2n
1ha2n1n
1ha2n1š
ha2r1t
1has
ha2s2e
1ha2š2t
1ha2t1b
1hat1c
1ha2t1č
1ha2t1d2
1ha2t1g
1ha2to
1hav
ha1va1
1haw
1ha2ži
1há
há1l2i1
há2ma2
h2ám
há1s2e2
há2s
há1še
há1ši
h1b2
hca2b
h1ca
h1cá2
hc1cá2
h2c1c
hci2l
h1c2i
h1ča2
hča2l
hčá2s1
h1čá
h1d2
1he
2heab
he2a
2heb1
he1d2e
he1ge1
1he1he1
h2e2h
he2i
he2mo1
he1m
2he1o2
2h2ep
he2š1t
2het
2hež
2h1g
2h1h
1hib
1h2ik
1hil
hi2l1d
hi2me
hi1m
1hine
h2i2n
1hi2n1g
h2io2
1hi2s1b2
1hi2s1v
2h2iv
hivl1
h1j
2hk
hká2n
h1k2á
h1k2o2
hk2u1l
h1ku
hku1m
2hl
h1l2a2
h1l2á2
h1l2e
h1l2i
hl1l2a2
h2l1l
h2lu
2hm
2h2n
h1ne
hno2n1
h1no
h2o
1h2o2š
hou1
2h1p
h1p2i2
hpi2h
h1ra
h1r2á
2h1s
2h1t
hta2g
h1ta
htá1d
h1tá
htá2l
htá2s1
hte1g
h1t2e
hte2r
ht1to2
h2t1t
h2u
2h2u2h
1h2ui
1hu2k
h2ul1
hu1na
h2un
hu1ne
1huo
huo1l1
hu2p
hur2
1hu1sa
hu2s
1hu2s1g
1hu2sm
1hu2s1s
1h2uš
2h2ut
1hu2t1t
1hu1u2
2huv
huvl1
2h1v
1hy
h1y1a1
2hæ
2h'
i1a1
ia1g2
ia2h
ia2m
ia2na
ia1p2
ia2s
ia2sk2
ia2t2t
i1á
iá1na1
iá1ra1
i2ba.
i1b2a
ib1be1
i2b1b
ibi1l
i1b2i
i1ca2
ic1c2o1
i2c1c
ice2n
i1c2e
i2c2k1
i1cu1
ida2l
i1da
i2d2at
i1d2á2
i1d2e
i2de2d
i2d2e2h
i2dež
i2di
1i2d1j
i1d1n2
i2d1oa
i1do2
i1d2u
i2d2u2h
iđ2a2i1
i1đ2a2
i1e2a
i2ed1
i2eg
ie2ga1
ie1g2o
i2el
ie1lo1
ie2lu
i1e1m
ie1ná1
ie1n
ie2n2i
i1era
ie1r
ier2á2
i2e2r1g
i2e2rk
i2er2o1
i2es
ie2s2e1
ie2sk
ie2š1
ievl1
i2ev
ie1ž
i1f
i2f1l
i2f1r
2i1g
i2gač
i1ga
i1ga2l
i2g1a2r
i2gaž
igái1
i1gá
i2ge.
i1ge
i2g2o
i2g1r2o1
i2h
i1haž
ih1ca1
ih1ne1
i2h2n
ihu1m
ih2u
2ii
ii1b2m2
i2id
ii1d2n2
ii2do2
ii2d2u
ii2h
i2i1j
ii1l2e2
ii2sa1
ii2s2t
ii1t2e1
i2it
i1j
ija1b
ije2
2ik
ika1n
i1k2a
iká1l
i1k2á
ik1cu1
ik1c
i2k2e
ike1l
ikl2á1
i1k2l2
i1k2o
iko2l
i1ko2m
i1ko1s
i2k1r
ik2ri
ikr2o1
iksu1
i2k1s
ik1ti2
i2k1t
iku2m
i1ku
ikvi1
ik1v
2i1l2a
ila2l
ila2r
i1l2á2
il2da
i2ld
il2d2u
i1l2i
i2liš
ilo1s
i1lo
i2lu
i1m
i2ma.
i1ma2
imá1h
i1má2
imá2s1
im1mu1
i2m1m2
i2mu1
2i2n
i1n1ak
i1n2aš
in2d2r2
i2n1d
i1n1es
1i2nf1
in1j
in1so1
i2ns
2io
io1d
i1o2h1t
i2oi2
i1o2k
io1na1
io1ná1
io1p2
i1or
i1o1s
i2o2š
io1t2
i1ov
i2p1l2
ipo1d
i1po
ip2os1
i1pu2
i1ra
i2ra2n
i1r2á
i1rá1l
i2r2d
i2r2e
i2ri
i1r2o
i1ro2d
i2r2ut
i1ru
i2sa
is1ar
is2at2
ise2n
i1s2e
i2set1
is1h
isid1
i1s2i
is2i1k
i2s2i2n
isip1
is2k2a2
is1k2o2
i2sp
is1so2
i2s1s
is2t2e
i2st
is2tu
i1su
iš2a2i1
i1ša
i1še
iš1l2á
išl2
i1šo
2it
itá1l
i1tá
it1c1
i2t1h
it2l2e
i2t1l
it1no1
i2t1n2
ito2m
i1to
ito1s
itu2b
i1tu
i1u
iu1m
2iv
iva2l
i1va
ive2a
i1ve
ive2n
i1vi
i2vi1đ
i1vu2
i1z
iz2a2i1
i1za
i1ža
i1že
i1žeš1
i1ži
1ja2d
jađ1
ja2g2o
ja1g
ja2h
ja2l
1ja2lg
ja2me
ja1m
ja2mo
jana1
ja2n2i
1ja2n1l2
ja2s
ja2š
ja2t1
1já
já2da
já2j1i
já1j
já2l
j2á2m
já2n
já1r2e1
já1z
jeas1
je2a
je1b
je2b2a1
je2di
1j2e2k
1jera
je1r
1je2st
1je1vu
j2ev
ji2b2a
j2i2d1
ji2e
1jieŋ
j2i2g
j2ii
1j2ik
ji1lo2
ji2me
ji1m
j2i1o
ji2s2e
ji2s2i
ji1so2
2j1j
jja1k
jjá2s1
j1já
jješ1
jji2
jjis2
j2o
jo2d
2joi
jo2l
jo2ma2
jo1m
jo1na1
1jor.
jo2rd1
1jo1ri
jos2
1jo2sk
jo2u1l
2j1s
j1s2i2
1j2ud1
ju1gá1
ju2g2o
1j2u2h
j2ui1
1j2ul
ju1m
ju1n1j
j2un
1ju2n1k
juo2s1
1juvl
2j1v
2j'
1k2a
ka1b2i1
2kač
ka2d
ka2ga
ka1g
ka2g2o
ka2h
ka1ku1
ka2ma2
ka1m
ka2me
ka1mo1
2ka2n1d
ka2n2i
ka2r
ka1r2á1
ka2r1t
ka2s
kas1h
ka2sk2
ka2to1
